Massachusetts, session 194th, S485.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of public health shall establish minimum staffing requirements at skilled
nursing care facilities and for all level I, II and III long-term care facilities as defined in 105
CMR 150.001. Working with 1199SEIU and other appropriate stakeholders, the department shall
develop amendments to the existing nursing services regulations contained in 105 CMR 150.007
that ensure these facilities employ an adequate number of nurses, certified nurse assistants, and
other staff to both meet all resident needs and ensure that sufficient nursing staff with the
appropriate competencies is working at any given time to assure resident safety and attain or
maintain the highest practicable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being of each resident,
as determined by resident assessments and individual plans of care. Said amended regulations
shall include specific standards, including but not limited to, a minimum 4.1 hours of care per
of 2

patient per day as well as direct-care staff-to-resident ratios to ensure consistent delivery of
quality care in a safe and sanitary facility.
The department shall issue public recommendations on these issues no later than six
months following final passage of this act.
of 2